Mississippi, session 20251E, HB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sums, or so much of those sums as may be necessary, are appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of funding K-12 and other related educational activities, including certain agencies and programs, in the State of Mississippi, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows: (a)  To the State Board of Education for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the State Department of Education, and excluding the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division............................................ $ 114,575,826.00. (b)  To the State Board of Education for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division of the State Department of Education............................ ........................................... $ 86,569,006.00. (c)  To the State Board of Education for the purpose of paying annual compensation to the Chickasaw Cession counties for sixteenth section lands which they lost through sale by the state, as provided in Sections 29-3-137 through 29-3-141, Mississippi Code of 1972.... $ 19,535,843.00. (d)  To the State Board of Education for defraying the expenses of the Mississippi Student Funding Formula...................... ............................................ $ 2,706,830,239.00. TOTAL AMOUNT OF STATE GENERAL FUNDS APPROPRIATED BY THIS SECTION BEING....................$ 2,927,510,914.00. SECTION 2.  The following sums, or so much of those sums as may be necessary, are appropriated out of any money in any special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds of the agencies or programs specified in the following paragraphs for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows: (a)  To the State Board of Education for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the State Department of Education,  excluding the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division. $ 1,998,705,677.00. (b)  To the State Board of Education for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division of the State Department of Education............................ ........................................... $ 22,721,640.00. (c)  To the State Board of Education for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Mississippi Student Funding Formula ........................................... $ 268,025,562.00. TOTAL AMOUNT OF SPECIAL FUNDS APPROPRIATED BY THIS SECTION BEING.................. $ 2,289,452,879.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, One Hundred Twenty-six Thousand Four Hundred Seventy-two Dollars ($126,472.00), or so much of that sum as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Health Care Expendable Fund to the State Department of Education for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the department for the Mississippi Eye Screening Program for providing vision safety services. SECTION 4.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, the following sums, or so much of those sums as may be necessary, are derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Education Enhancement Fund pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, as follows: (a)  To the State Department of Education, excluding the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division, for the following purposes: Literacy Initiative and Assessment......... $    6,805,774.00 Educable Child............................ $ 9,500,000.00 Grants to school districts for capital facilities and buses.......... $   16,000,000.00 Instructional materials................... $ 25,000,000.00 Students with Special Needs................ $ 1,800,000.00 Implementing Performance-Based Data Collection and Accreditation Model................................ $ 274,937.00 Testing................................... $ 6,125,670.00 Mississippi School for Math and Science.............................. $ 1,131,000.00 Mississippi School for Fine Arts. ......... $      927,632.00 Early Learning Collaboratives.............. $   21,210,526.00 Other Early Learning Programs.............. $   13,000,000.00 Early Learning Coaches.................... $ 3,251,533.00 Math Coaches.............................. $ 5,000,000.00 WorkKeys.................................. $ 1,000,000.00 Advanced Placement, Dual Credits, International Baccalaureate, Cambridge Diploma Endorsements........ $      300,000.00 Vocational Technical Grants................ $    1,000,000.00 Mississippi School for the Deaf and Blind............................ $ 2,557,037.00 Children's Foundation of Mississippi....... $ 437,000.00 Excel by 5................................ $ 300,000.00 Alyssa's Law Pilot Program................ $ 160,000.00 Mississippi Teacher Residency Program...... $ 3,500,000.00 TOTAL..................................... $ 119,281,109.00 (b)  To the State Department of Education to defray the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division...... .............................................. $ 6,637,258.00. (c)  To the State Department of Education to provide funding for the Mississippi Student Funding Formula..................... .............................................. $ 268,025,562.00. SECTION 5.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act to the State Department of Education, excluding the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:              $   18,529,863.00 Special Funds:              $   19,024,080.00 Total Funds:               $   37,553,943.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:          $   35,966,230.00 Progressions:              $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:            $    1,587,713.00 Total Personal Services:    $   37,553,943.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   330 Time-Limited:                124 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. The Legislature authorized one (1) new headcount, which is included in the authorized headcount above for Fiscal Year 2026. New Headcount Title Authorized: General Management Job Classification - 1 SECTION 6.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided in this act shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of the State Department of Education, excluding the expenses of the Vocational and Technical Education Division. Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Special Education Number of Special Education Teachers (FTE)              6,500 Number of Gifted Education Teachers                      750 Percent of Children with Disabilities in General Education Early Childhood Programs while Decreasing the Percent in Self-Contained Special Education Early Childhood Classrooms                              76.00 General Administration Total Dollars Spent on General Administration                            16,000,000.00 Percent of Total Budget Spent on General Administration                                    10.00 Create a Public-Facing Data System for All Stakeholders                                 100.00 Create a User-Friendly Website for the Public and School Districts to Access Data to Make Decisions                           100.00 Create a Roadmap to Improve the Mississippi Student Information System            100.00 Number of Research Results Published to Support Improved Student Outcomes and Teacher Effectiveness                                 9 Graduation & Career Readiness Percent of Students Graduating from High School Ready for College or Career in Each Subgroup                                    100.00 Early Childhood Education Percent of Kindergarten Students Achieving End-Of-Year Target Score on Kindergarten Readiness Post-Test                 100.00 Percent of Early Learning Collaborative Sites Meeting Required Rate of Readiness          100.00 Number of Students Enrolled in Title I or Locally Funded Pre-K Classes                   8,866 Teacher Tng & Professional Dev Reduce the Proportion of Inexperienced and Non-Certified Teachers in Schools              31.00 Percent of Districts Reporting Professional Growth System (PGS) Ratings for Teachers and Leaders                         100.00 Percent of Teacher Candidates Passing Licensure Exams on the First Attempt               75.00 Elementary Education Percent Increase of Students who Pass the 3rd Grade Reading Assessment at the First Administration in Each Subgroup              90.00 Secondary Education Increase the Number of Students Participating in and Passing Advanced Placement (AP), International Baccalaureate (IB) and Cambridge Exams in Each Subgroup                                  60.00 Percent of Students Ready for College as Measured by Meeting ACT Benchmarks in Each Content Area (Public School Class Data, Grade 11)                                   90.00 Assessment & Development Percent of Students Proficient (Levels 4-5) on Statewide Assessments (Grades 3-8 & High School Composite) in Each Subgroup                                         80.00 Percent of Students Scoring Levels 1-3 on Statewide Assessments in Each Subgroup                                         20.00 Percent of Pre-Kindergarten Students in Public Schools Attaining Kindergarten Readiness on the Pre-K End-Of-Year Assessment                                        90.00 School Performance Percent of Schools Rated "C" or Higher                 90.00 Percent of Districts Rated "C" or Higher                90.00 Percent of Students Demonstrating Growth on Statewide ELA Assessments in Each Subgroup                                         70.00 Percent of Students Demonstrating Growth on Statewide Math Assessments in Each Subgroup                                         75.00 Percent of Students Participating in Dual Credit in Each Subgroup                      60.00 Percent of Students Passing Dual Credit in Each Subgroup                                  98.00 Increase the Growth of D and F Districts Demonstrating Growth, by Improving the Letter Grade and/or Increasing the Number of Points within a Letter Grade             80.00 Increase the Growth of D and F Schools by Improving the Letter Grade and/or Increasing the Number of Points within a Letter Grade                                      80.00 Increase the Growth of Districts of Transformation by Improving the Letter Grade and/or Increasing the Number of Points within a Letter Grade                     100.00 Increase the Growth of Schools Under Districts of Transformation by Improving the Letter Grade and/or Increasing the Number of Points within a Letter Grade            100.00 Number of High Schools Rated D or F                       10 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 7.  No school district shall expend any funds, received under the School Ad Valorem Reduction Grant, unless such school district has specifically identified the amount of the grant within the published budget as required by Section 37-61-9, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The published budget shall include the following statement:  "Ad Valorem taxes will be $________ less as a result of the Ad Valorem Reduction Grants enacted by the Mississippi Legislature in 1992." SECTION 8.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, funds in the amount of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall come from income derived from the principal of the Education Improvement Trust Fund created by Section 206A, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, and One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be used for the School for Math and Science. SECTION 9. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act to the Vocational and Technical Education Division of the State Department of Education, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:               $  3,324,498.00 Special Funds:               $    714,395.00 Total Funds:                 $  4,038,893.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:            $  3,535,004.00 Progressions:                $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:             $    503,889.00 Total Personal Services:      $  4,038,893.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   48 Time-Limited: 5 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 10.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, an amount not to exceed One Million Twenty-three Thousand Five Hundred Seventy-four Dollars ($1,023,574.00) is authorized for the support of vocational and technical education programs as authorized in Section 37-31-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, for a period in excess of ten (10) months in a calendar year. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Vocational and Technical Education Division of the State Department of Education shall, with the funds appropriated in Section 1, transfer no more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) to the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission for the purpose of providing matching funds to purchase soil conservation equipment. SECTION 12.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, no more than One Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($175,000.00) is provided for the purpose of supporting the Future Farmers of America Center. SECTION 13.  The State Department of Education shall transfer the designated amounts to the appropriate entities, which shall assume full responsibility for the expenditure of these funds in accordance with state laws and accept all responsibility for any improper expenditure, for the following: Detention Centers............................... $ 3,000,000.00. Dyslexia Program................................ $ 225,000.00. Amplify Data Coaching........................... $ 800,000.00. Magnolia Speech School.......................... $ 1,000,000.00. Sight Savers.................................... $ 475,000.00. Teach for America............................... $ 860,000.00. Teacher Corp and Principal Corp................. $ 300,000.00. Vision Screening Research....................... $ 325,000.00. Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia................. $ 200,000.00. Algebra Nation.................................. $ 1,100,000.00. Mississippi Construction Education Program....... $ 212,500.00. T. K. Martin Center............................. $ 100,000.00. JumpStart Act................................... $ 225,000.00. Mastery Prep.................................... $ 225,000.00. Arts for All Mississippi........................ $     50,000.00. Can U University................................ $ 125,000.00. Reading Clinic.................................. $ 700,000.00. TOTAL.......................................... $ 9,922,500.00. SECTION 14.  It is the intention of the Legislature that of the funds provided for Other Early Learning Programs in Section 4(a), Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00) is included for the Mississippi Department of Education to provide grant opportunities for Other Early Learning Programs through public schools including other public school preschool programs not participating in Early Learning Collaboratives. SECTION 15.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, an amount not to exceed One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) shall be used for technological methods for agricultural programs, computer science, engineering or robotic engineering programs and equipment upgrades and Mississippi Elementary (ME) STEM and STEAM programs from the Career and Technical Education Division of the State Department of Education. All programs must meet Mississippi Science Standards and/or College and Career Standards. Of the funds appropriated in this section, an amount not to exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be distributed to the Mississippi State University Center for Cyber Education and used for computer science programs development and teacher training for elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools for the purpose of developing K-12 computer science curricula, including both academic and career and technical education programs, developing and delivering teacher training, and working with the State Board of Education and Institutions of Higher Learning in the state to develop teacher preparation programs for computer science endorsements.  All programs must meet the 2018 Mississippi Computer Science Standards and/or Mississippi College and Career Standards. SECTION 16.  It is the intention of the Legislature that computer science courses may be taught by certified teacher or for elementary level classes, computer science courses may be taught by teachers who are trained by the district in computer science instruction. SECTION 17.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, the sum of Sixty-two Thousand One Hundred Ninety-one Dollars ($62,191.00), which is the aggregate sum that the school districts in the Chickasaw Cession receive annually from interest payments from the Chickasaw School Fund under Section 212, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, shall be deducted from the allocations to the school districts as provided in Section 29-3-137, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be distributed among the school districts in the Chickasaw Cession by the State Department of Education in the manner that those interest payments were distributed during Fiscal Year 1985. SECTION 18.  Of the funds provided in this act for the purpose of funding the Mississippi Student Funding Formula, the Student Base Amount in Fiscal Year 2026 shall be Six Thousand Eight Hundred Forty-seven Dollars and Thirty-three Cents ($6,847.33). SECTION 19.  With the funds provided in this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that School Attendance Officers and academic teachers at the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Mississippi School for the Blind shall receive their annual increment. SECTION 20.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the State Board of Education shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated in this act and that those records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the budget requests for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process for each agency and institution appropriated funds within the provisions of this act. SECTION 21.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a) to the State Board of Education, not less than Twenty-four Million Eighty Thousand Dollars ($24,080,000.00) shall be used for National Board Certification.  Of this amount, Seven Hundred Thousand Dollars ($700,000.00) shall be used for the World Class Teacher Program providing instruction and assistance to teachers seeking National Board Certification. SECTION 22.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 and Section 4(a) not less than Seventeen Million Five Hundred Fifty-eight Thousand Dollars ($17,558,000.00) shall be used for the Educable Child Program.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the State Board of Education shall allocate funding for the Educable Child Program based upon a recalculated formula in a manner to include only those billable days funded through appropriation of state funds and not District funds.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Educable Child funds shall be exempt from budget cuts made to the Department of Education by the Legislature and/or the Office of the Governor. SECTION 23.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a) and Section 4(a), not less than Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall be used for the Education Scholarship Account (ESA) Program.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Education Scholarship Account (ESA) funds shall not be reduced by the State Department of Education and/or the Office of the Governor. SECTION 24.  The public school districts of the state are authorized at their discretion to pay with local funds one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance premiums of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for all retired members of the Public Employees' Retirement System who are employed as school bus drivers by the school districts.  It is the intention of the Legislature that no state funds shall be used for this purpose. SECTION 25.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in those received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 26.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, not less than Six Million Four Hundred Fourteen Thousand Eight Hundred Ninety-eight Dollars ($6,414,898.00) shall be used for the Compulsory School Attendance Office and School Attendance Officers. SECTION 27.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that Three Million Sixty Thousand Dollars ($3,060,000.00) shall be used for the Mary Kirkpatrick-Mary Sprayberry Public School Nurse Program.  The amount of Three Million Sixty Thousand Dollars ($3,060,000.00) is provided from the Department of Health. SECTION 28.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the State Board of Education shall charge a fee for room and board for students who enroll in the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science and the Mississippi School of Arts.  Such fees will be waived for any student enrolled in the State Children's Health Insurance Program.  The amount of such fees shall be Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each semester. SECTION 29.  It is the intent of the Legislature that each eligible employee who meets the National Board requirements under Section 37-19-7(2), Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be paid the full supplement and that such supplement shall be included on a prorated basis in the employee's monthly paycheck. SECTION 30.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi Department of Education may loan any general or special source fund amount, not to exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), to any school district for the purpose of providing funds to school districts through the Emergency Assistance Fund as outlined in Section 37-17-6, Mississippi Code of 1972, during the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.  The school districts receiving these loans shall repay the Mississippi Department of Education the amount of the loan on or before June 30, 2026. SECTION 31.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a), Two Million One Hundred Sixty-five Thousand Two Hundred Ninety Dollars ($2,165,290.00) is provided for the operation of a State-Wide Synchronous Instructional Project. SECTION 32.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a), Seven Hundred Thousand Dollars ($700,000.00) shall be transferred to the Board of Health no later than December 31, 2025. SECTION 33.  Any school district receiving funds through Save the Children may provide a ten percent (10%) match from local funds for implementation of the program. SECTION 34.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a), Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) is provided for the Mississippi Community Oriented Policing Services in Schools (MCOPS) grant program.  A portion of these funds not to exceed one percent (1%) may be used for training and administrative costs related to oversight and auditing of the program. SECTION 35.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a) and Section 2(a), Twenty-nine Million Dollars ($29,000,000.00) is provided for an Early Childhood Education Initiative program.  The funding shall be provided to early learning collaboratives in Fiscal Year 2026 as follows:  no less than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per student in a full-day program and no less than One Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($1,250.00) per student in a half-day program.  Funds must be matched as provided by Section 37-21-51, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 36.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a) and Section 4(a), Fifteen Million Ninety-four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($15,094,500.00) shall be used for the Literacy Initiative and Assessment and monitoring and evaluating the adoption and implementation of high-quality instructional materials that have been reviewed through the approved state process and distributed through regional textbook depository as outlined in Section 37-43-23, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 37.  Of the funds appropriated herein, funding is provided for the ACT test, which is the college readiness portion of the state accountability model. SECTION 38.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a), Two Million Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand One Hundred Thirty-two Dollars ($2,750,132.00) shall be used for the Mississippi School of the Arts and Four Million Thirty-three Thousand Seven Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($4,033,775.00) shall be used for the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science.  It is the intention of the Legislature that of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a) for the Mississippi School of the Arts, One Million Three Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Sixty-six Dollars ($1,375,066.00) shall be paid to the school no later than July 10, 2025, and One Million Three Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Sixty-six Dollars ($1,375,066.00) shall be paid no later than January 10, 2026.  All funds appropriated from Section 4(a) for the Mississippi School of the Arts shall be paid to the school each month within ten (10) working days after such amount was received by the Department of Education.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the State Board of Education shall not reduce the appropriated amounts provided in this act for the Mississippi School of the Arts and the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science. SECTION 39.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(b) and Section 2(b), Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) is provided for career and technical grants to schools for qualified students as authorized by Section 37-153-15, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 40.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, the following amounts shall be available to the Schools for the Blind and Deaf:  Ten Million Five Hundred Thirty-six Thousand Eight Hundred Forty-two Dollars ($10,536,842.00) from Section 1(a), Two Million Five Hundred Fifty-seven Thousand Thirty-seven Dollars ($2,557,037.00) from Section 4(a), and Two Million Four Hundred Fifty-nine Thousand Seven Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($2,459,725.00) from Section 2(a). SECTION 41. Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a) of this act, One Million Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,400,000.00) is provided for the continuation of the current school safety platform. SECTION 42.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, an amount not to exceed Four Million One Hundred Seventy-one Thousand Three Hundred One Dollars ($4,171,301.00) is authorized to fully fund the contract between the Department of Education and the Research & Curriculum Unit at Mississippi State University to fund career and technical curricula, services to secondary schools and career and technical assessments. SECTION 43.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(b) to the State Board of Education, Five Hundred Sixty-two Thousand Nine Hundred Ninety-nine Dollars ($562,999.00) is provided for secondary career and technical education instructors teaching at post-secondary institutions. SECTION 44.  In addition to all other funds appropriated herein, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Charter School Authorizer Board for operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $ 1,400,000.00. SECTION 45.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(b), One Million Four Hundred Thirty-two Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-two Dollars ($1,432,872.00) shall be provided for new Career and Technical Education Programs as determined by the Division of Vocational and Technical Education at the Mississippi Department of Education.  Of the funds appropriated to the department for these programs, no amount shall be expended by the department to defray administrative costs. SECTION 46.  The Mississippi Department of Education shall provide an annual report detailing the funding of industry certifications and the anticipated industry certifications that will be achieved in the upcoming fiscal year to the Legislative Budget Office and the Legislature no later than January 15, 2026. SECTION 47.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Education Enhancement Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Mississippi Department of Education for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Education Enhancement Funds as authorized in House Bill 1823, 2024 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.................................. $ 30,117,393.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds as allocated herein: a. Instructional Materials................ $ 2,732,190.00. b. Early Learning Collaboratives........... $ 15,485,203.00. c. Other Early Learning Programs........... $ 11,900,000.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2025, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year. In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 48.  With the funds appropriated herein, the Mississippi Department of Education is authorized to make payments for expenses incurred during prior fiscal years for an amount not to exceed Fifteen Thousand Three Hundred Nine Dollars and Eighty-six Cents ($15,309.86). These payments are for previous year invoices for Accelerate Learning Inc. and McGraw Hill LLC. SECTION 49.  It is the intent of the Legislature that each eligible professional school counselor employee who meets the year of teaching experience requirements under Section 37-151-5(m), Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be considered having a year of experience for purposes of the annual experience salary increment. SECTION 50.  The money appropriated in this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 51.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.